Arkansas, session 2025, HB1447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-38-105, concerning the exceptions to the
licensure of plumbers, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(5) The installation of a pipe from the stub out pipe to the
septic tank for onsite wastewater systems if the installer is properly
licensed by the Department of Health under the Arkansas Sewage Disposal
Systems Act, § 14-236-101 et seq.

/s/Long






*JMB324*
02-27-2025 13:07:24 JMB324